Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska32-1043
Voting systems; rental contracts; authorized.

The governing body of any county which has procured voting systems may enter into a contract for the rental of such systems with a city, village, or school district. Such rentals may be paid out of the general fund or by levying taxes to provide funds for payment of such rentals. Such rental contracts may be made to extend over any period of time.

Laws 1994, LB 76, § 337;

Laws 2003, LB 358, § 39.